Nebraska, session 109, LB170A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB170A LB170A
2025 2025
Section 1. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000,000 from the
General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 2. The State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000,000 from the
General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund on or
after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated (1) $100,000,000 from the
School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund for FY2025-26 and (2)
$100,000,000 from the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Revenue, for Program 121, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 170, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$100,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $100,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-